Washington statutes.
RCW 1.20.051

Daylight saving time. (Contingent repeal.)

At two o'clock antemeridian Pacific Standard Time of the second Sunday in March each year the time of the state of Washington shall be advanced one hour, and at two o'clock antemeridian Pacific Standard Time of the first Sunday in November in each year the time of the state of Washington shall, by the retarding of one hour, be returned to Pacific Standard Time.

[ 2018 c 22 s 2; 1963 c 14 s 1; 1961 c 3 s 1 (Initiative Measure No. 210, approved November 8, 1960).]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: (1) 2019 c 297 contains a contingent repeal section and a contingent effective date section. This section and RCW 1.20.050 and 1.20.052 will be repealed under 2019 c 297 s 4 on the date provided in 2019 c 297 s 5 when the contingency in 2019 c 297 s 5 occurs.

(2) See also federal law, which prescribes identical start and end dates for daylight saving time. 15 U.S.C. Sec. 260a.

Contingent repeal—2019 c 297: See note following RCW 1.20.052.

Explanatory statement—2018 c 22: "RCW 1.08.025 directs the code reviser, with the approval of the statute law committee, to prepare legislation for submission to the legislature "concerning deficiencies, conflicts, or obsolete provisions" in statutes. This act makes technical, nonsubstantive amendments as follows:

(1) Section 2 of this act amends RCW 1.20.051 to conform the start and end dates of daylight saving time to the dates in federal law, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 260a.

(2) Section 3 of this act is intended to correct an apparent error in RCW 6.23.120. The legislature apparently intended to refer to one hundred twenty percent of the redemption amount, rather than one hundred twenty percent greater than the redemption amount. P.H.T.S., LLC v. Vantage Capital, LLC, 186 Wn. App. 281, 289 n.8, 345 P.3d 20, 24 (2015).

(3) Section 4 of this act is intended to correct an apparent error in RCW 6.27.060. The section contains a cross-reference to the fee schedule in RCW 36.18.020, when the actual fee is found in RCW 36.18.016(6).

(4) Section 5 of this act amends RCW 9A.56.130 to reflect multiple changes in subsection numbering of a cross-referenced section.

(5) Section 6 of this act is intended to correct an apparent error in RCW 11.02.005(10). One sentence in the subsection is repeated in nearly identical form in the same subsection.

(6) Section 7 of this act amends RCW 13.40.193 to reflect a change in subsection numbering of a cross-referenced section.

(7) Section 8 of this act is intended to correct an apparent error in RCW 15.24.100. Section 8, chapter 15, Laws of 2016 sp. sess. removed the language authorizing an assessment in RCW 15.24.100. The assessment referred to appears to be the assessment authorized in RCW 15.24.090.

(8) Section 9 of this act clarifies language in RCW 26.50.070(4) by consistently using the term "ex parte temporary order" throughout the subsection.

(9) Section 10 of this act merges a double amendment created when section 39, chapter 7, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess. amended RCW 43.21B.005 without reference to the amendments made by section 4, chapter 210, Laws of 2010.

(10) Section 11 of this act is intended to correct an apparent error in RCW 43.43.823(5). RCW 9.41.114 provides a five-day deadline for firearms dealers to report certain information, but the informational form in RCW 43.43.823(5) states that the deadline is two days.

(11) Section 12 of this act amends RCW 46.55.080 to reflect a change in subsection numbering of a cross-referenced section.

(12) Section 13 of this act is intended to remove doubt as to the validity of portions of RCW 51.32.095. Section 3, chapter 137, Laws of 2015 repealed the expiration date of 2013 and 2011 amendments to RCW 51.32.095, but allowed 2007 amendments to the section to expire on June 30, 2016.

(13) Section 14 of this act repeals RCW 82.04.4483, which was previously repealed by section 504, chapter 323, Laws of 2017 without cognizance of technical amendments made by section 19, chapter 135, Laws of 2017.

(14) Section 15 of this act is intended to clarify the expiration date of RCW 90.56.335. Section 950, chapter 36, Laws of 2016 sp. sess. (the supplemental omnibus appropriations act) amended RCW 90.56.335 without cognizance of the section's expiration date." [ 2018 c 22 s 1.]